Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2520
Examination; requirements.

Each applicant for licensure under the Occupational Therapy Practice Act shall take an examination which tests the applicant's knowledge of the basic and clinical sciences relating to occupational therapy and occupational therapy theory and practice including, but not limited to, professional skills and judgment in the utilization of occupational therapy techniques and methods and such other subjects as identified by the body administering the national licensure examination. Each applicant shall follow the rules as outlined by such body and meet the minimum requirements for the examination. Results of the examination shall be sent to the board for verification of entry-level competency.

Laws 1984, LB 761, § 36;

Laws 1985, LB 250, § 18;

Laws 1987, LB 473, § 61;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-6108;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 860;

Laws 2025, LB257, § 15.